Missouri, session 2026, SB1221.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 188.035, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 188.035,
to read as follows:
188.035. [Whoever, with intent to do so, shall take
the life of a child aborted alive, shall be guilty of murder
of the second degree.] 1. This section shall be known and
may be cited as the "Born-Alive Abortion Survivors
Protection Act".
2. A child born alive during or after an abortion or
an attempted abortion shall have all the rights, privileges,
and immunities available to other persons, citizens, and
residents of this state, including any other liveborn child.
3. Any health care provider licensed, registered, or
certified in this state who is present at the time a child
is born alive during or after an abortion or attempted
abortion shall:
(1) Exercise the same degree of professional skill,
care, and diligence to preserve the life and health of the
child as a reasonably diligent and conscientious health care
provider would render to any other child born alive at the
same gestational age or with the same fetal weight. This
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1221 2
shall include, but not be limited to, never abandoning the
child, but instead determining whether to initiate
resuscitation, to continue treatment, or to provide comfort
and palliative care; and
(2) If necessary, ensure that the child born alive is
immediately transported and admitted to a hospital following
the exercise of skill, care, and diligence required under
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
4. In addition to any criminal or administrative
liability which may be incurred, a person shall be civilly
liable when he or she:
(1) Knowingly, recklessly, or negligently causes the
death of a child who is born alive during or after an
abortion or an attempted abortion;
(2) Knowingly fails to comply with any of the
provisions of subsection 3 of this section if the person is
a health care provider subject to such provisions;
(3) Knowingly performs or induces, or attempts to
perform or induce, an unlawful abortion upon another person;
(4) Knowingly aids or abets another person to undergo
a self-induced abortion or attempted self-induced abortion
or to procure an unlawful abortion or attempted unlawful
abortion;
(5) Knowingly, recklessly, or negligently supplies or
makes available any instrument, device, medicine, drug, or
any other means or substance for another person to undergo a
self-induced abortion or attempted self-induced abortion or
to procure an unlawful abortion or attempted unlawful
abortion; or
(6) Knowingly incites, solicits, or otherwise uses
speech or writing as an integral part of conduct in
violation of a valid criminal statute to influence another

SB 1221 3
person to undergo a self-induced abortion or attempted self-
induced abortion or to procure an unlawful abortion or
attempted unlawful abortion.
5. If injury or death arises out of or results from
any circumstance under subsection 4 of this section to any
of the following persons, including:
(1) A person upon whom the unlawful abortion or
attempted unlawful abortion was performed or induced;
(2) A person who underwent a self-induced abortion or
attempted self-induced abortion or who procured an unlawful
abortion or attempted unlawful abortion;
(3) A child who was born alive during or after an
abortion or attempted abortion; or
(4) An unborn child;
then a cause of action for personal injury, bodily injury,
or wrongful death may be brought. In a cause of action for
wrongful death, the spouse, partner, parents, and children
of the deceased person, child, or unborn child shall be
entitled to bring the action. Damages for injury or death
may be recovered for, including, but not limited to, any
damages described in chapters 537 and 538 that are
applicable; loss of future fertility; loss of love and
companionship of the spouse, partner, parent, child, or
unborn child; and for injury to or destruction of the
spouse, partner, parent, child, or unborn child relationship
in such amount as, under all the circumstances of the case,
may be just. The court shall also award a prevailing
plaintiff reasonable attorney's fees and litigation costs,
including, but not limited to, expert witness fees and
expenses as part of the costs. A defendant shall not be
permitted to plead or prove as a defense that the plaintiff

SB 1221 4
or deceased person assumed the risk of undergoing, or
consented to undergo, a self-induced abortion or attempted
self-induced abortion or that the plaintiff or deceased
person assumed the risk of procuring, or consented to
procure, an unlawful abortion or attempted unlawful
abortion. The fact that a plaintiff or deceased person
consented to undergo a self-induced abortion or attempted
self-induced abortion or to procure an unlawful abortion or
attempted unlawful abortion shall not, in and of itself, be
considered evidence of contributory or comparative
negligence. Any exculpatory agreement between or among
parties that is related to undergoing a self-induced
abortion or attempted self-induced abortion or to procuring
an unlawful abortion or attempted unlawful abortion shall be
against public policy and shall be void.
6. No person shall maintain a cause of action or
receive an award of damages under this section if such
person engaged in criminal conduct, or in domestic violence
100 or sexual assault, as defined in section 455.010, that
101 caused the pregnancy in which another person was injured or
102 died as the result of an abortion or attempted abortion. No
103 person shall maintain a cause of action or receive an award
104 of damages under this section if he or she is a family or
105 household member, as defined in section 455.010, who aided
106 or abetted such person who engaged in criminal conduct, or
107 in domestic violence or sexual assault, as defined in
108 section 455.010, that caused the pregnancy in which another
109 person was injured or died as the result of an abortion or
110 attempted abortion.
111 7. The provisions of this section shall be applied,
112 interpreted, and construed in a manner consistent with the

SB 1221 5
113 Constitution of the United States and the constitution of
114 this state.
✓